North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 5. Nonprofit Corporations Receiving Public Funds.

§ 159-40.
Special regulations pertaining to nonprofit corporations receiving public funds.

If a city or county grants or appropriates one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more in any fiscal year to a nonprofit corporation or organization, the city or county may require that the nonprofit corporation or organization have an audit performed for the fiscal year in which the funds are received and may require that the nonprofit corporation or organization file a copy of the audit report with the city or county.

Any nonprofit corporation or organization which receives one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more in State funds shall, at the request of the State Auditor, submit to an audit by the office of the State Auditor for the fiscal year in which the funds were received.

Every nonprofit corporation or organization which has an audit performed pursuant to this section shall file a copy of the audit report with the office of the State Auditor.

This section does not apply to the following:

Sheltered workshops.

Adult development activity programs.

Private residential facilities for individuals with an intellectual or developmental disability.

Developmental day care centers.

Any nonprofit corporation or organization whose sole use of public funds is to provide hospital services or operate as a volunteer fire department, rescue squad, or ambulance squad, or which operates as a junior college, college, or university duly accredited by the southern regional accrediting association.

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 905.

History.

1977, c. 687, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1195, s. 1; 1979, c. 905; 2018-47, s. 12.